Maryland, session 2026, SB0348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–310.5.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0348*

SENATE BILL 348
(a) If a newborn is delivered in a hospital following a high–risk pregnancy, the
hospital shall:
(1) Complete a postpartum infant and maternal referral form and submit
the form to the local health department for the county in which the birthing parent resides;
(2) Provide to the birthing parent resources and information specific to the
circumstances of the birthing parent, including information regarding the risks, signs,
preventive measures, and treatment needs for postpartum complications, including
cardiovascular conditions, chronic disease, substance misuse, and mental health
conditions; and
(3) Call CONTACT the birthing parent at least 24, but not later than [48]
72, hours after discharging the parent to evaluate the parent’s status and, as necessary,
provide information about postpartum complications.
(b) On or before October 1 each year, each local health department shall submit
to the Department a report that includes the number and type of referrals made based on
the referral forms submitted to the local health department in accordance with subsection
(a)(1) of this section.
19–3B–03.1.
(a) If a newborn is delivered in a freestanding birthing center following a
high–risk pregnancy, the freestanding birthing center shall:
(1) Complete a postpartum infant and maternal referral form and submit
the form to the local health department for the county in which the birthing parent resides;
(2) Provide to the birthing parent resources and information specific to the
circumstances of the birthing parent, including information regarding the risks, signs,
preventive measures, and treatment needs for postpartum complications, including
cardiovascular conditions, chronic disease, substance misuse, and mental health
conditions; and
(3) Call CONTACT the birthing parent at least 24, but not later than [48]
72, hours after discharging the parent to evaluate the parent’s status and, as necessary,
provide information about postpartum complications.
(b) On or before October 1 each year, each local health department shall submit
to the Department a report that includes the number and type of referrals made based on
the referral forms submitted to the local health department in accordance with subsection
(a)(1) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.